tests/verbs-TAI.yaml
  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 20) tv.aa.inv p1.excl.s_pl":
    pahkaskinkweh<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><sg><s_pl> : mpahkaskinkwehkuna
    pahkaskinkweh<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><pl><s_pl> : mpahkaskinkwehkunanak
    poxin<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><sg><s_pl> : mpoxinkuna
    poxin<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><pl><s_pl> : mpoxinkunanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 19) tv.aa.inv p1.incl.s_pl":
    ushim<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><sg><s_pl> : kushimkuna
    ushim<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><pl><s_pl> : kushimkunanak
    payaxkh<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><sg><s_pl> : kpayaxkhkuna
    payaxkh<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><pl><s_pl> : kpayaxkhkunanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 20) tv.aa.inv p1.incl.s_pl":
    pahkaskinkweh<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><sg><s_pl> : kpahkaskinkwehkuna
    pahkaskinkweh<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><pl><s_pl> : kpahkaskinkwehkunanak
    poxin<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><sg><s_pl> : kpoxinkuna
    poxin<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><pl><s_pl> : kpoxinkunanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 19) tv.aa.inv p2.s_pl":
    ushim<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : kushimawa
    ushim<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><pl><s_pl> : kushimawaok
    payaxkh<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : kpayaxkhawa
    payaxkh<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><pl><s_pl> : kpayaxkhawaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 20) tv.aa.inv p2.s_pl":
    pahkaskinkweh<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : kpahkaskinkwehawa
    pahkaskinkweh<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><pl><s_pl> : kpahkaskinkwehawaok
    poxin<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : kpoxinkuwa
    poxin<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><pl><s_pl> : kpoxinkuwaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 19) tv.aa.inv p3.pl":
    ushim<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl> : ushimawoo
    payaxkh<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl> : payaxkhkuwoo

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 20) tv.aa.inv p3.pl":
    pahkaskinkweh<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl> : pahkaskinkwehawoo
    poxin<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl> : poxinkuwoo

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 21) tv.aa.inv p1.s_sg":
    keshinal<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><sg><s_sg> : nkeshinalakw
    keshinal<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><pl><s_sg> : nkeshinalkuk
    tun<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><sg><s_sg> : ntunakw
    tun<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><pl><s_sg> : ntunkuk

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 22) tv.aa.inv p1.s_sg":
    kishih<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><sg><s_sg> : nkishihakw
    kishih<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><pl><s_sg> : nkishihkuk
    kiskh<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><sg><s_sg> : nkiskhakw
    kiskh<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><pl><s_sg> : nkishkhkuk

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 21) tv.aa.inv p2.s_sg":
    keshinal<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_sg> : keshinalakw
    keshinal<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : keshinalkuk
    tun<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_sg> : ktunakw
    tun<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : ktunkuk

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 22) tv.aa.inv p2.s_sg":
    kishih<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_sg> : kishihakw
    kishih<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : kishihkuk
    kiskh<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_sg> : kiskhakw
    kiskh<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : kiskhkuk

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 21) tv.aa.inv p3.s_sg":
    keshinal<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><sg><s_sg> : keshinalku
    keshinal<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl><s_sg> : keshinalku
    tun<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><sg><s_sg> : tunku
    tun<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl><s_sg> : tunku

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 22) tv.aa.inv p3.s_sg":
    kishih<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><sg><s_sg> : kishihku
    kishih<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl><s_sg> : kishihku
    kiskh<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><sg><s_sg> : kiskhku
    kiskh<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl><s_sg> : kiskhku

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 21) tv.aa.inv p1.excl.s_pl":
    keshinal<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><sg><s_pl> : nkeshinalkuna
    keshinal<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><pl><s_pl> : nkeshinalkunanak
    tun<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><sg><s_pl> : ntunkuna
    tun<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><pl><s_pl> : ntunkunanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 22) tv.aa.inv p1.excl.s_pl":
    kishih<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><sg><s_pl> : nkishihkuna
    kishih<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><pl><s_pl> : nkishihkunanak
    kiskh<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><sg><s_pl> : nkiskhkuna
    kiskh<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><pl><s_pl> : nkiskhkunanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 21) tv.aa.inv p1.incl.s_pl":
    kishih<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><sg><s_pl> : kishihkuna
    kishih<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><pl><s_pl> : kishihkunanak
    kiskh<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><sg><s_pl> : kiskhkuna
    kiskh<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><pl><s_pl> : kiskhkunanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 21) tv.aa.inv p2.s_pl":
    keshinal<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : keshinalawa
    keshinal<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><pl><s_pl> : keshinalawaok
    tun<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : ktunawa
    tun<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><pl><s_pl> : ktunawaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 22) tv.aa.inv p2.s_pl":
    kishih<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : kishihkuwa
    kishih<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><pl><s_pl> : kishikuwaok
    kiskh<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : kiskhawa
    kiskh<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><pl><s_pl> : kiskhawaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 21) tv.aa.inv p3.pl":
    keshinal<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl> : keshinalkuwoo
    tun<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl> : tunkuwoo

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 22) tv.aa.inv p3.pl":
    kishih<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl> : kishihkuwoo
    kiskh<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl> : kiskhkuwoo

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 23) tv.aa.inv p1.s_sg":
    muh<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><sg><s_sg> : nemuhakw
    muh<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><pl><s_sg> : nemuhkuk
    ulin<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><sg><s_sg> : nulinakw
    ulin<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><pl><s_sg> : nulinkuk

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 24) tv.aa.inv p1.s_sg":
    kekhitahol<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><sg><s_sg> : nkekhitaholakw
    kekhitahol<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><pl><s_sg> : nkekhitaholkuk
    keshewipxkonen<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><sg><s_sg> : nkeshewipxkonenakw
    keshewipxkonen<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><pl><s_sg> : nkeshewipxkonenkuk

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 23) tv.aa.inv p2.s_sg":
    muh<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_sg> : kemuhakw
    muh<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : kemuhkuk
    ulin<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_sg> : kulinakw
    ulin<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : kulinkuk

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 24) tv.aa.inv p2.s_sg":
    kekhitahol<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_sg> : kekhitaholakw
    kekhitahol<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : kekhitaholkuk
    keshewipxkonen<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_sg> : keshewipxkonenakw
    keshewipxkonen<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : keshewipxkonenkuk

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 23) tv.aa.inv p3.s_sg":
    muh<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><sg><s_sg> : muhku
    muh<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl><s_sg> : muhkku
    ulin<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><sg><s_sg> : welinku          #ulinku also possible
    ulin<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl><s_sg> : welinku

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 24) tv.aa.inv p3.s_sg":
    kekhitahol<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><sg><s_sg> : kekhitaholku
    kekhitahol<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl><s_sg> : kekhitaholku
    keshewipxkonen<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><sg><s_sg> : keshewipxkonenku
    keshewipxkonen<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl><s_sg> : keshewipxkonenku

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 23) tv.aa.inv p1.excl.s_pl":
    muh<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><sg><s_pl> : nemuhkuna
    muh<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><pl><s_pl> : nemuhkunanak
    ulin<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><sg><s_pl> : nulinkuna
    ulin<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><pl><s_pl> : nulinkunanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 24) tv.aa.inv p1.excl.s_pl":
    kekhitahol<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><sg><s_pl> : nkekhitaholkuna
    kekhitahol<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><pl><s_pl> : nkekhitaholkunanak
    keshewipxkonen<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><sg><s_pl> : nkeshewipxkonenkuna
    keshewipxkonen<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><pl><s_pl> : nkeshewipxkonenkunanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 23) tv.aa.inv p1.incl.s_pl":
    muh<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><sg><s_pl> : kemuhkunanak
    muh<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><pl><s_pl> : kemuhkuna
    ulin<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><sg><s_pl> : kulinkuna
    ulin<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><pl><s_pl> : kulinkunanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 24) tv.aa.inv p1.incl.s_pl":
    kekhitahol<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><sg><s_pl> : kekhitaholkuna
    kekhitahol<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><pl><s_pl> : kekhitaholkunanak
    keshewipxkonen<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><sg><s_pl> : keshewipxkonenkuna
    keshewipxkonen<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><pl><s_pl> : keshewipxkonenkunanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 23) tv.aa.inv p2.s_pl":
    muh<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : kemuhkuwa
    muh<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><pl><s_pl> : kemuhkuwaok
    ulin<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : kulinkuwa
    ulin<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><pl><s_pl> : kulinkuwaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 24) tv.aa.inv p2.s_pl":
    kekhitahol<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : kekhitaholkuwa
    kekhitahol<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><pl><s_pl> : kekhitaholkuwaok
    keshewipxkonen<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : keshewipxkonenawa
    keshewipxkonen<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><pl><s_pl> : keshewipxkonenawaok

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 23) tv.aa.inv p3.pl":
    muh<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl> : muhkuwoo
    ulin<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl> : welinkuwoo

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 24) tv.aa.inv p3.pl":
    kekhitahol<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl> : kekhitaholkuwoo
    keshewipxkonen<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl> : keshewipxkonenawoo

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 25) tv.aa.inv p1.s_sg":
    naxal<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><sg><s_sg> : naxalakw
    naxal<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><pl><s_sg> : naxalkuk
    nusum<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><sg><s_sg> : nusumakw
    nusum<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><pl><s_sg> : nusumkuk

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 26) tv.aa.inv p1.s_sg":
    lankum<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><sg><s_sg> : ntelankumkuk
    lankum<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><pl><s_sg> : ntelankumakw
    winkwichem<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><sg><s_sg> : newinkwichemakw
    winkwichem<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><pl><s_sg> : newinkwichemkuk

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 25) tv.aa.inv p2.s_sg":
    naxal<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_sg> : knaxalakw
    naxal<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : knaxalkuk
    nusum<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_sg> : knusumakw
    nusum<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : knusumkuk

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 26) tv.aa.inv p2.s_sg":
    lankum<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_sg> : ktelankumakw
    lankum<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : ktelankumkuk
    winkwichem<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_sg> : kewinkwichemakw
    winkwichem<v><tv><aa><inv><p2><sg><s_pl> : kewinkwichemkuk

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 25) tv.aa.inv p3.s_sg":
    lankum<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><sg><s_sg> : lankumku
    lankum<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl><s_sg> : lankumku
    winkwichem<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><sg><s_sg> : winkwichemku
    winkwichem<v><tv><aa><inv><p3><pl><s_sg> : winkwichemku

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 25) tv.aa.inv p1.excl.s_pl":
    naxal<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><sg><s_pl> : naxalkuna
    naxal<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><pl><s_pl> : naxalkunanak
    nusum<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><sg><s_pl> : nusumkuna
    nusum<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><pl><s_pl> : nusumkunanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 26) tv.aa.inv p1.excl.s_pl":
    lankum<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><sg><s_pl> : ntelankumkuna
    lankum<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><pl><s_pl> : ntelankumkunanak
    winkwichem<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><sg><s_pl> : newinkwichemkuna
    winkwichem<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><excl><pl><s_pl> : newinkwichemkunanak

  "[lexc/twol] (Swat Verb Resources Group 25) tv.aa.inv p1.incl.s_pl":
    naxal<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><sg><s_pl> : knaxalkuna
    naxal<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><pl><s_pl> : knaxalkunanak
    nusum<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><sg><s_pl> : knusumkuna
    nusum<v><tv><aa><inv><p1><incl><pl><s_pl> : knusumkunanak
